Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF603.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1839YH (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. 603 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 256.20 Attendance center doors ââ 1 grant program ââ fund established. 2 1. If moneys are appropriated by the general assembly for 3 a fiscal year for purposes of this section, the department 4 shall establish an attendance center doors grant program to 5 provide grants to applicant school districts, accredited 6 nonpublic schools, charter schools, and innovation zone schools 7 to allow such schools to purchase doors that comply with the 8 requirements established under section 280.37, subsection 1, 9 paragraph âcâ or âdâ . 10 2. The state board of education shall adopt rules pursuant 11 to chapter 17A to administer the attendance center doors grant 12 program. The rules adopted by the state board of education 13 must establish an application process, application materials, 14 eligibility requirements, and award criteria. 15 3. An attendance center doors grant program fund is 16 established in the state treasury under the control of the 17 department. The fund shall be administered by the department 18 and shall consist of moneys appropriated by the general 19 assembly and other moneys received by the department for 20 deposits in the fund. The moneys in the fund are appropriated 21 to the department for the attendance center doors grant 22 program. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund at 23 the close of the fiscal year shall not revert to the general 24 fund of the state but shall remain available for expenditure 25 for the attendance center doors grant program for subsequent 26 fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 27 2, interest or earnings on the moneys in the fund shall be 28 credited to the fund. 29 Sec. 2. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 30 by adding the following new paragraphs: 31 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0t. Be subject to and comply with the 32 requirements of section 280.36 relating to electronic school 33 threat reporting platforms, access control plans, and visitor 34 entry plans in the same manner as a school district. 35 -1- LSB 1839YH (2) 91 jda/jh 1/ 11 H.F. 603 NEW PARAGRAPH . 00t. Be subject to and comply with the 1 requirements of section 280.37 relating to attendance center 2 doors and the locks on attendance center doors, vestibules, 3 windows, and video surveillance systems in the same manner as 4 a school district. 5 Sec. 3. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 6 by adding the following new paragraphs: 7 NEW PARAGRAPH . r. Be subject to and comply with the 8 requirements of section 280.36 relating to electronic school 9 threat reporting platforms, access control plans, and visitor 10 entry plans in the same manner as a school district. 11 NEW PARAGRAPH . s. Be subject to and comply with the 12 requirements of section 280.37 relating to attendance center 13 doors and the locks on attendance center doors, vestibules, 14 windows, and video surveillance systems in the same manner as 15 a school district. 16 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 280.36 School safety ââ threat 17 reporting ââ access control plans and visitor entry plans. 18 1. The board of directors of each school district and the 19 authorities in charge of each accredited nonpublic school shall 20 do all of the following with respect to the school safety 21 bureauâs electronic school threat reporting platform: 22 a. Sign up for, and participate in, the electronic school 23 threat reporting platform. 24 b. Publish a link to the electronic school threat reporting 25 platform on the school districtâs or accredited nonpublic 26 schoolâs internet site. 27 c. Provide training to students and employees related to how 28 to use the electronic school threat reporting platform. 29 2. The board of directors of each school district and the 30 authorities in charge of each accredited nonpublic school shall 31 do all of the following: 32 a. Develop and implement an access control plan that 33 allows the school district or accredited nonpublic school 34 to monitor and restrict who may enter an attendance center, 35 -2- LSB 1839YH (2) 91 jda/jh 2/ 11 H.F. 603 prevent unauthorized access to attendance centers, and mitigate 1 potential threats to students, staff, and school property. 2 b. Develop and implement a visitor entry plan that 3 allows the school district or accredited nonpublic school 4 to effectively identify, vet, and monitor all visitors to 5 attendance centers. 6 3. The state board of education shall adopt rules pursuant 7 to chapter 17A to administer this section. 8 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 280.37 School safety ââ physical 9 infrastructure. 10 1. The board of directors of each school district and the 11 authorities in charge of each accredited nonpublic school shall 12 do all of the following: 13 a. Install new door systems, or modify existing door 14 systems, to prevent an active shooter or other perpetrator from 15 blocking or otherwise restricting means of ingress or egress 16 through any attendance center door. 17 b. (1) Label each exterior door to each attendance center, 18 on both the interior side and exterior side of the door, using 19 a sequential numbering system that begins at the primary door 20 to the attendance center and proceeds clockwise around the 21 attendance center. The labels placed on the exterior of the 22 door must be at least twelve inches tall, must be reflective, 23 and must be visible from adjacent streets and driveways. 24 (2) Label each interior door located within each attendance 25 center, on both the interior side and exterior side of the 26 door, using a sequential numbering system. 27 (3) Ensure that the high-quality emergency operations plan 28 developed pursuant to section 280.30 is updated to reflect the 29 labeling of doors required under subparagraphs (1) and (2). 30 c. Require that the classroom doors in any attendance center 31 that is constructed on or after the effective date of this Act 32 include locks that satisfy all of the following requirements: 33 (1) The locks must allow the door to be locked from the 34 classroom side without a key, tool, or special knowledge or 35 -3- LSB 1839YH (2) 91 jda/jh 3/ 11 H.F. 603 effort. 1 (2) The locks must allow the door to be unlocked from the 2 classroom side without a key, tool, or special knowledge or 3 effort, even if the lock is remotely engaged. 4 (3) The locks must allow the door to be unlocked from 5 outside the classroom only if a key, code, credential, or other 6 method of deactivation is used. 7 (4) The locks must allow for single-motion egress. 8 d. Require that, if the classroom doors in any attendance 9 center need to be replaced or upgraded on or after the 10 effective date of this Act, the locks on the replacement or 11 upgraded doors must satisfy all of the requirements established 12 in paragraph âcâ . 13 e. Require any attendance center that is constructed 14 on or after the effective date of this Act to include a 15 secure vestibule system that is designed to provide for the 16 identification and vetting of a visitor before the visitor is 17 allowed to enter the interior of the attendance center. The 18 secure vestibule system must satisfy all of the following 19 requirements: 20 (1) The system must include a two-way audio and video 21 communication system. 22 (2) The system must include an electronic door release 23 system. 24 (3) Any glass in the vestibule that is less than seven feet 25 from the floor of the vestibule must be shatter resistant and 26 intrusion resistant. 27 f. Require that, if the structure of an attendance center 28 is renovated on or after the effective date of this Act, the 29 board of directors of the school district or the authorities in 30 charge of the accredited nonpublic school must evaluate whether 31 the renovation should include the incorporation of a secure 32 vestibule system that satisfies the requirements established 33 in paragraph âeâ . 34 g. Require that all exterior doors and access-level windows 35 -4- LSB 1839YH (2) 91 jda/jh 4/ 11 H.F. 603 in any attendance center that is constructed on or after the 1 effective date of this Act be shatter resistant or intrusion 2 resistant. 3 h. Require that, if any exterior doors or access-level 4 windows in any attendance center need to be replaced or 5 upgraded on or after the effective date of this Act, the 6 replacement doors or access-level windows must be shatter 7 resistant or intrusion resistant. 8 i. Require that all interior doors and windows in any 9 attendance center, including sidelights that are near a door 10 and large enough, if broken, to allow a person to enter the 11 room or access the doorâs locking mechanism, in any attendance 12 center that is constructed on or after the effective date of 13 this Act be shatter resistant or intrusion resistant. 14 j. Require that, if any interior doors or windows in 15 any attendance center, including sidelights that are near a 16 door and large enough, if broken, to allow a person to enter 17 the room or access the doorâs locking mechanism, need to be 18 replaced or upgraded on or after the effective date of this 19 Act, the replacement doors or windows must be shatter resistant 20 or intrusion resistant. 21 k. Install a video surveillance system in each attendance 22 center that satisfies all of the following requirements: 23 (1) The video surveillance system must be consistent with 24 the requirements of the federal Family Educational Rights and 25 Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. Â§1232g, and any regulations promulgated 26 pursuant to that Act. 27 (2) In the interior of the attendance center, the video 28 surveillance systemâs coverage must extend beyond entry points 29 and cover areas that are not within the normal view of staff or 30 security personnel, including hallways and enclosed stairwells. 31 (3) On the exterior of the attendance center, the video 32 surveillance systemâs coverage must cover the attendance 33 centerâs facilities and parking areas. 34 (4) The video surveillance system must allow local law 35 -5- LSB 1839YH (2) 91 jda/jh 5/ 11 H.F. 603 enforcement and first responders to access the system in the 1 event of an active health or safety emergency event. 2 2. The board of directors of a school district and the 3 authorities in charge of an accredited nonpublic school 4 may adopt policies and acquire equipment to ensure that all 5 employees of the school district or accredited nonpublic 6 school are able to communicate with the school districtâs 7 or accredited nonpublic schoolâs administrative office in 8 emergency situations while the employee is in an instructional 9 area located on school property or in an outdoor recreation 10 area on school property. 11 3. The state board of education shall adopt rules pursuant 12 to chapter 17A to administer this section. 13 Sec. 6. SCHOOL EVALUATION OF THE POTENTIAL USE OF 14 SHATTER-RESISTANT FILM AND INTRUSION-RESISTANT FILM. The 15 board of directors of each school district, the authorities in 16 charge of each accredited nonpublic school, and the governing 17 body of each charter school and innovation zone school shall 18 evaluate the potential use of shatter-resistant film or 19 intrusion-resistant film in all attendance centers, including 20 in all windows, windowed doors, and sidelights that are large 21 enough for a person to enter or gain access to a locking 22 mechanism. 23 Sec. 7. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION ââ REVIEW OF REQUIREMENTS 24 ASSOCIATED WITH HIGH-QUALITY EMERGENCY OPERATIONS PLANS. 25 1. The department of education shall review and study 26 the requirements associated with the high-quality emergency 27 operations plans developed by school districts and accredited 28 nonpublic schools pursuant to section 280.30. The department 29 of education shall consider all of the following during the 30 review and study: 31 a. Whether and to what extent the department should adopt 32 rules pursuant to chapter 17A to provide guidance in the 33 development of high-quality emergency operations plans. 34 b. Whether a privacy warning should be included at the 35 -6- LSB 1839YH (2) 91 jda/jh 6/ 11 H.F. 603 beginning of each high-quality emergency operations plan. 1 c. How to best incorporate all of the following into the 2 high-quality emergency operations plans: 3 (1) Building maps, site maps, and critical incident maps. 4 (2) Training for teachers, staff responsible for students 5 who are not in a designated classroom space, bus drivers, 6 substitute teachers and other floating staff, and facilities 7 staff. 8 (3) Plans to collaborate with first responders, including 9 the appointment of a school safety and security contact and 10 how first responders will gain access to attendance centers, 11 building maps, site plans, and critical incidents maps. 12 (4) An emergency mass notification plan. 13 (5) An annual review of vulnerabilities and physical 14 measures used to strengthen school security conducted in 15 collaboration with law enforcement or emergency management 16 personnel. 17 (6) Plans to coordinate with local law enforcement to 18 determine the functionality of in-building, two-way emergency 19 responder communication coverage for all areas on school 20 district or accredited nonpublic school property in which 21 students and staff may regularly be located. 22 d. How to best include first responders in the annual drills 23 required in high-quality emergency operations plans. 24 e. How school districts and accredited nonpublic schools 25 can internally assess the functionality of the drills conducted 26 under high-quality emergency operations plans and use the 27 results of the assessment to improve the school districtâs or 28 accredited nonpublic schoolâs high-quality emergency operations 29 plan. 30 2. The department of education shall submit its findings and 31 recommendations to the general assembly on or before December 32 31, 2025. The findings and recommendations shall include a 33 proposal for modifications to section 280.30. 34 Sec. 8. STATE MANDATE FUNDING SPECIFIED. In accordance 35 -7- LSB 1839YH (2) 91 jda/jh 7/ 11 H.F. 603 with section 25B.2, subsection 3, the state cost of requiring 1 compliance with any state mandate included in this Act shall 2 be paid by a school district from state school foundation aid 3 received by the school district under section 257.16. This 4 specification of the payment of the state cost shall be deemed 5 to meet all of the state funding-related requirements of 6 section 25B.2, subsection 3, and no additional state funding 7 shall be necessary for the full implementation of this Act 8 by and enforcement of this Act against all affected school 9 districts. 10